District of Columbia statutes.
24-201.24

Reimbursement of United States.

The United States shall be reimbursed, as heretofore, for the maintenance of District of Columbia inmates, and all sums paid by such District for such maintenance for the service of the fiscal year 1927 and subsequent fiscal years shall be covered into the Treasury as “miscellaneous receipts.”

Apr. 29, 1926, 44 Stat. 347, ch. 195, title II

History

1981 Ed., § 24-423.
1973 Ed., § 24-423.

Prior Codifications